Hawaii statutes.
[§663-9.1] Exception of animal owners to
civil liability. (a) As used in this section:

(1) "Premises" includes any building or
portion thereof or any real property owned, leased, or occupied by the owner or
harborer of an animal.

(2) "Enter or remain unlawfully" means to
be in or upon premises when the person is not licensed, invited, or otherwise
privileged to be upon the premises. A person is not licensed or privileged to
enter or remain in or upon a premises if a warning or warnings have been posted
reasonably adequate to warn other persons that an animal is present on the
premises. A person who, regardless of the person's intent, enters or remains
in or upon premises which are at the time open to the public does so with
license and privilege unless the person defies a lawful order not to enter or
remain, personally communicated to the person by the owner of the premises or
some other authorized person. A license or privilege to enter or remain in a
building which is only partly open to the public is not a license or privilege
to enter or remain in that part of the building which is not open to the
public. A person who enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently unused
land, which is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner designed to
exclude intruders, does so with license and privilege unless notice against
trespass is personally communicated to the person by the owner of the land or
some other authorized person, or unless notice is given by posting in a
conspicuous manner.

(3) The definitions of "intentionally" and
"knowingly" as contained in sections 702-206(1) and 702-206(2) shall
apply.

(b) Notwithstanding sections 663-1 and 663-9,
any owner or harborer of an animal shall not be liable for any civil damages
resulting from actions of the animal occurring in or upon the premises of the
owner or harborer where the person suffering either personal or property damage
as a proximate result of the actions of the animal is found by the trier of
fact intentionally or knowingly to have entered or remained in or upon such
premises unlawfully.

(c) Notwithstanding sections 663-1 and 663-9,
any owner or harborer of an animal shall not be liable for any civil damages
resulting from actions of the animal where the trier of fact finds that:

(1) The animal caused such damage as a proximate
result of being teased, tormented, or otherwise abused without the negligence,
direction, or involvement of the owner or harborer; or

(2) The use of the animal to cause damage to person
or property was justified under chapter 703. [L 1980, c 218, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next